Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.36.070

Revocation of proxy.

Any designation of a proxy may be revoked by written notice addressed to the legislative body of the code city signed by the officer who made the designation and filed and recorded in the same manner as the notice of designation. It shall be effective from the time of its recording but shall not affect the validity of any signatures theretofore made.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.36.070.]